New York, session 2025-2026, S3890.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3210-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3210-a. Classroom placement of twins or higher order multiples in 4 schools located in Nassau or Suffolk county. 1. In the counties of 5 Nassau or Suffolk, a parent or guardian of twins or higher order multi- 6 ples may request that such twins or higher order multiples be placed in 7 the same classroom if the children are in the same grade level at the 8 same school. The school may recommend classroom placement to the 9 parents and provide professional education advice to the parents to 10 assist them in making the best decision for their children's education. 11 A school shall provide the placement requested by the children's parent 12 or guardian, unless the school board makes a classroom placement deter- 13 mination following the school principal's request according to this 14 section. The parent or guardian shall request the classroom placement no 15 later than fourteen days after the first day of each school year or 16 fourteen days after the first day of attendance of the children during a 17 school year if the children are enrolled in the school after the school 18 year commences. 19 2. At the end of the initial grading period, if the school principal, 20 in consultation with the children's classroom teacher, determines that 21 the requested classroom placement is disruptive to the school, the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04239-01-5 S. 3890 2 1 school principal may request that the school board determine the chil- 2 dren's classroom placement. 3 3. For purposes of this section, "higher order multiples" means trip- 4 lets, quadruplets, quintuplets, or more. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed five years after such date.